Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4559.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. This act may be cited as the "promotion of governmental services act". Sec. 3. As used in this act: (a) "Local government" means a county, city, village, or township. (b) "State agency" means a department, board, commission, office, agency, authority, or other unit of state government. (c) "Taxpayer funded" means funded by federal, state, or local money collected from taxes, fines, or fees. Sec. 5. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a state agency or local government that offers any service without charge to residents of this state may not use the word "free" to promote the service and shall instead use the phrase "taxpayer funded".